North Dakota, session 69, SB2095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 27-09.1-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
27-09.1-11. Excuses from jury service.
1. As used in this section, "law enforcement officer" means any ful l - time salaried sheriff ,
sheriff's deputy, police chief, policeman, or any other individual who is licensed to
perform peace officer law enforcement duties under chapter 12 - 63 and is employed
ful l - time by a state or political subdivision criminal justice agency or branch .
2. The court, upon request of a prospective juror or on its own initiative, shall determine
on the basis of information provided on the juror qualification form or interview with the
prospective juror or other competent evidence whether the prospective juror should be
excused from jury service. The clerk shall enter this determination in the space
provided on the juror qualification form.
2. A person
3. An individual who is not disqualified for jury service may be excused from jury service
by the court upon a showing of undue:
a. Undue hardship, extreme inconvenience, or public necessity, for a period the
court deems necessary, at the conclusion of which the personindividual shall
reappear for jury service in accordance with the court's direction; or
b. The individual being a law enforcement officer, if the jury service is for a criminal
trial.
Page No. 1 25.0050.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 2. APPLICATION. This Act applies to any jury summons sent to a prospective
juror after the effective date of this Act.
Page No. 2 25.0050.02000